Tennessee, session 114, SB0894.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-6-116(a), is amended by deleting
the language "twenty-fourth month" and substituting "forty-eighth month".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-6-116(e), is amended by deleting
the language "two (2) years" and substituting "four (4) years".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the renewal of licenses set to expire on or after that date.
SB0894
001482
- 1 -